Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB322.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.2841 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any person whose parent or any nonmarried widow or widower whose spouse
was a resident of the Commonwealth of Kentucky upon becoming a law
enforcement officer, firefighter, [or ]volunteer firefighter, or emergency
medical services personnel and who was killed while in active service or
training for active service or who died as a result of a service-connected
disability shall not be required to pay any matriculation or tuition fee upon
admission to any state-supported university, community college, or vocational
training institution. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to any
firefighter or volunteer firefighter who is killed or dies under the conditions
covered in this subsection on July 1, 1989, or thereafter. The provisions of
this subsection shall apply to any emergency medical services personnel
who was killed or died under the conditions covered in this subsection on
July 1, 2000, or thereafter.
(b) In order to obtain the benefits conferred by paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the parent-child relationship shall be shown by birth certificate, adoption
papers, or other documentary evidence. The spousal relationship shall be
shown by a marriage certificate or other documentary evidence. The parent's
or spouse's service and the cause of death shall be evidenced by certification
from the records of the Kentucky Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the
appropriate city or county law enforcement agency which employed the
deceased, the administrative agency for the fire department or fire protection
district recognized for funding under KRS 95A.262, [or ]the administrative
agency having jurisdiction over any paid firefighters of all counties and cities
of all classes, or the county, city, or administrative agency employing the
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/5/2025 8:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 487
emergency medical services personnel.
(2) (a) Any person whose parent or any nonmarried widow or widower whose spouse
was an employee participating in a state-administered retirement system, and
not otherwise covered by subsection (1) of this section, and who died as a
result of a duty-related injury as described in KRS 61.621 shall not be
required to pay any matriculation or tuition fee upon admission to any state-
supported university, community college, or vocational training institution.
(b) In order to obtain the benefits conferred by paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the parent-child relationship shall be shown by birth certificate, adoption
papers, or other documentary evidence. The spousal relationship shall be
shown by a marriage certificate or other documentary evidence. The parent's
or spouse's service and the cause of death shall be evidenced by certification
from the records of the employing agency or the appropriate retirement
system.
(3) If one so admitted to a state-supported university, community college, or vocational
training institution under the provisions of this section shall have obtained a cash
scholarship paid or payable to the institution, from whatever source, the amount of
the scholarship shall be applied to the credit of the applicant in the payment of
incidental expenses of his attendance at the institution, and any balance, if the terms
of the scholarship permit, shall be returned to the applicant.
(4) As used in this section, "emergency medical services personnel" has the same
meaning as in KRS 61.315.
Section 2. KRS 164.2842 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The spouse, regardless of age, and any child who is over the age of seventeen
(17) and under the age of twenty-three (23), of a permanently and totally
disabled law enforcement officer, firefighter, [or ]volunteer firefighter, or
emergency medical services personnel injured while in active service or in
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/5/2025 8:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 487
training for active service[, who is over the age of seventeen (17) and under
the age of twenty-three (23)] shall not be required to pay any matriculation or
tuition fee upon his admission to any state-supported university, community
college, or vocational training institution for up to a maximum of one
hundred twenty-eight (128) credit hours of undergraduate instruction[ a
period not in excess of thirty-six (36) months in order to obtain a diploma, nor
in excess of the lesser number of months required for a certificate of
completion].
(b) For the spouse or child to be entitled to benefits under this section, the
disabled law enforcement officer, firefighter, [or ]volunteer firefighter, or
emergency medical services personnel shall be rated permanently and totally
disabled for pension purposes or one hundred percent (100%) disabled for
compensation purposes by the Kentucky Justice and Public Safety Cabinet,
the appropriate city or county law enforcement agency which employed the
disabled, the administrative agency for the fire department or fire protection
district recognized for funding under KRS 95A.262, [or ]the administrative
agency having jurisdiction over any paid firefighters of all counties and cities
of all classes, or the county, city, or administrative agency employing the
emergency medical services personnel, or if deceased, the claim to benefits is
to be based on the rating held by the law enforcement officer, firefighter, [or
]volunteer firefighter, or emergency medical services personnel at the time of
death. The parent's or spouse's service and rating shall be evidenced by
certification from the records of the Kentucky Justice and Public Safety
Cabinet, the appropriate local law enforcement agency, the administrative
agency for the fire department or fire protection district recognized for
funding under KRS 95A.262, [or ]the administrative agency having
jurisdiction over any paid firefighters of all counties and cities of all classes,
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/5/2025 8:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 487
or the county, city, or administrative agency employing the emergency
medical services personnel.
(c) In the absence of certification of permanent and total disability by the
Kentucky Department of Workers' Claims, the Kentucky Justice and Public
Safety Cabinet, the appropriate local law enforcement agency, the
administrative agency for the fire department or fire protection district
recognized for funding under KRS 95A.262, [or ]the administrative agency
having jurisdiction over any paid firefighters of all counties and cities of all
classes, or the county, city, or administrative agency employing the
emergency medical services personnel, medical evidence showing permanent
and total disability or the existence of permanent and total disability for a
period of at least thirty (30) days immediately prior to death may be accepted,
if this evidence is signed by a physician licensed to practice or an official of
an accredited medical hospital.
(d) The parent-child relationship shall be shown by birth certificate, legal
adoption papers, or other documentary evidence. The spousal relationship
shall be shown by a marriage certificate or other documentary evidence.
(e) To entitle a spouse or child to benefits under this section the disabled law
enforcement officer, firefighter, [or ]volunteer firefighter, or emergency
medical services personnel shall have been a resident of the Commonwealth
of Kentucky upon becoming a law enforcement officer, firefighter, [or
]volunteer firefighter, or emergency medical services personnel.
(2) (a) The spouse, regardless of age, and any child who is over the age of seventeen
(17) and under the age of twenty-three (23), of a person who was an
employee participating in a state-administered retirement system and not
otherwise covered by subsection (1) of this section and who was disabled as a
result of a duty-related injury as described in KRS 61.621[, who is over the
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/5/2025 8:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 487
age of seventeen (17) and under the age of twenty-three (23)] shall not be
required to pay any matriculation or tuition fee upon his admission to any
state-supported university, community college, or vocational training
institution for up to a maximum of one hundred twenty-eight (128) credit
hours of undergraduate instruction[ a period not in excess of thirty-six (36)
months in order to obtain a diploma, nor in excess of the lesser number of
months required for a certificate of completion].
(b) The parent-child relationship shall be shown by birth certificate, legal
adoption papers, or other documentary evidence. The spousal relationship
shall be shown by a marriage certificate or other documentary evidence.
(3) The marriage of an eligible child shall not serve to deny full entitlement to the
benefits provided in this section.
(4) As used in this section, "emergency medical services personnel" has the same
meaning as in KRS 61.315.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/5/2025 8:55 AM Jacketed